Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 7. Wholesome Meat

§§ 35-7-701 through 35-7-711.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regulating food industry, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 218, §§ 1 through 9, Laws 1979, ch. 122, § 1, and Laws 1999, ch. 108, § 1, constituted the Wyoming Wholesome Meat Act of 1969.